Utah statutes.
57-12-14.    Dispute resolution -- Additional appraisal.

(1)  If the agency and the private property owner or displaced person disagree on any issue arising out of this chapter, the private property owner may submit the dispute for mediation or arbitration according to the procedures and requirements of Section 13-43-204.

(2) (a)  The private property owner or displaced person may request that the mediator or arbitrator authorize an additional appraisal.

(b)  If the mediator or arbitrator determines that an additional appraisal is reasonably necessary to reach a resolution of the case, the mediator or arbitrator may:

(i)  have an additional appraisal of the property prepared by an independent appraiser; and

(ii)  require the agency to pay the costs of the first additional appraisal.

